Illinois, session 104th, SB1984.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Electronic Transactions in Dental 5Care Billing Act is amended by changing Sections 15, 20, and 25 6and by adding Sections 30, 35, 40, and 45 as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 111/15)8    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "Department" means the Department of Insurance. 10    "Director" means the Director of Insurance. 11    "Dental care provider" means a dentist who bills for 12services in Illinois. 13    "Dental plan carrier" means an entity subject to the 14insurance laws and regulations of this State or subject to the 15jurisdiction of the Director that contracts or offers to 16contract to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or 17reimburse any of the costs of dental care services, including 18an accident and health insurance company, a health maintenance 19organization, a limited health service organization, a dental 20service plan corporation, a health services plan corporation, 21a voluntary health services plan, or any other entity 22providing a plan of dental insurance, dental benefits, or 23dental health care services.   SB1984- 2 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1    "Portal" means a website or reasonably similar method of 2sharing information that (i) is compliant with the federal 3Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 4and the regulations promulgated thereunder, (ii) provides 5resources and information to dentists and subscribers, and 6(iii) is compatible with dental software so universal 7accessibility may be achieved. 8(Source: P.A. 102-146, eff. 7-23-21.) 9    (215 ILCS 111/20)10    Sec. 20. Uniform electronic claims and eligibility 11transactions required. 12    (a) Beginning January 1, 2028 2026, no dental plan carrier 13is required to accept from a dental care provider eligibility 14for a dental plan transaction or dental care claims or 15equivalent encounter information transaction except as 16provided in this Act. 17    (b) All dental plan carriers and dental care providers 18must exchange claims and eligibility information 19electronically using the standard electronic data interchange 20transactions for claims submissions, payments, and 21verification of benefits required under the Health Insurance 22Portability and Accountability Act in order to be compensable 23by the dental plan carrier. 24(Source: P.A. 102-146, eff. 7-23-21; 103-705, eff. 7-19-24.)   SB1984- 3 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1    (215 ILCS 111/25)2    Sec. 25. Rules; modification of rules. 3    (a) The Department may shall adopt rules as necessary to 4implement this Act and may establish further exemptions to 5this Act by rule. 6    (b) A dental plan carrier or dental care provider may not 7add to or modify the uniform electronic claims and eligibility 8requirements adopted by the Department. 9(Source: P.A. 102-146, eff. 7-23-21.) 10    (215 ILCS 111/30 new)11    Sec. 30. Exemptions. Notwithstanding any other provision 12of this Act, a dental care provider shall not be required to 13submit claims electronically under any of the following 14circumstances:15        (1) The dental care provider is with a dental practice 16    that, including the dental care provider, employs 4 or 17    fewer full-time or full-time equivalent employees.18        (2) There is a temporary technological or electrical 19    failure that prevents a claim from being submitted 20    electronically.21        (3) The dental care provider graduated from a dental 22    school in 1985 or before.23        (4) The dental care provider graduated from a dental 24    school within 10 years before the effective date of this 25    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and meets one   SB1984- 4 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1    of the following criteria:2            (A) The dental care provider started his or her 3        own practice.4            (B) The dental care provider has purchased a 5        practice that has been previously exempted from the 6        requirements of this Act.7        (5) The dental care provider demonstrates financial 8    difficulties in buying or managing an electronic claims 9    submission software system.10        (6) The dental care provider has a disability or 11    medical reason that prohibits the dental care provider 12    from submitting claims electronically.13        (7) The dental care provider is a temporary dentist 14    operating a practice for another dentist who is 15    temporarily unable to practice.16        (8) There are other unforeseen practice disruptions, 17    including, but not limited to, natural disasters, physical 18    damage to the practice, or damage to the data system.19    A dental care provider who is exempted from filing claims 20electronically under this Section shall file a form with the 21Department indicating the applicable exemption. The Department 22shall provide the form no later than January 1, 2028.  23    (215 ILCS 111/35 new)24    Sec. 35. Eligibility and benefit verification portal. 25    (a) Each dental plan carrier shall establish a portal as   SB1984- 5 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1described in this Section and shall include information about 2each type of subscription contract that is sufficient to allow 3subscribers and dentists to determine the covered services 4under each subscription contract and the payment or 5reimbursement amounts for those covered services at the 6procedure level. The information in the portal shall include 7the following, as appropriate:8        (1) Effective date of plan.9        (2) Status of plan.10        (3) Termination date of plan.11        (4) Coordination of benefits; standard or 12    non-duplicating.13        (5) Claim address.14        (6) Payer identification.15        (7) Covered services.16        (8) Whether a deductible applies and to which 17    services.18        (9) Remaining deductible: family.19        (10) Remaining deductible: individual.20        (11) Preferred in-network co-insurance amount.21        (12) In-network co-insurance amount.22        (13) Out-of-network co-insurance amount.23        (14) Preferred in-network co-payment amount.24        (15) In-network co-payment amount.25        (16) Out-of-network co-payment amount.26        (17) Remaining plan maximum.  SB1984- 6 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1        (18) Remaining lifetime maximum.2        (19) Last treatment plan payment date applied to the 3    annual maximum or deductible to help determine if a 4    benefit has been used outside of the primary office.5        (20) Age limitation.6        (21) Frequency limit by time period.7        (22) Frequency limit by tooth number.8        (23) Next available service date based on any 9    frequency limit due to prior treatment history or added 10    custom benefits, such as medical conditions and roll-over.11        (24) Whether there is a missing tooth clause.12        (25) Number of quads benefited per visit.13        (26) Waiting period due to preexisting condition or 14    missing tooth limitation.15        (27) Prior authorization requirements.16        (28) Processing policies, such as bundling, 17    downcoding, least expensive alternative treatment 18    requirements, fees disallowed in conjunction with other 19    treatments, and limitations by location.20        (29) A comprehensive list of all current American 21    Dental Association Codes stating if they are covered, the 22    percentage of coverage, and if there are any conditions 23    that preclude coverage.24    (b) At minimum, the portal shall provide current and 25accurate real-time benefit eligibility and benefits 26information. It is the responsibility of the dental plan   SB1984- 7 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1carrier to ensure patient eligibility and benefits reporting 2is timely and accurate. 3    (215 ILCS 111/40 new)4    Sec. 40. Dental plan carrier requirements. A dental plan 5carrier must:6        (1) Provide an electronic portal that is compliant 7    with the federal Health Insurance Portability and 8    Accountability Act of 1996 and the regulations promulgated 9    thereunder and that allows dental care providers to submit 10    claims electronically and directly to dental plan carrier. 11    The portal shall be provided free of charge to the dental 12    care provider.13        (2) Accept attachments, including, but not limited to, 14    x-rays and other supporting information for claims, in an 15    electronic format with the initial electronic claim's 16    submission and any further submissions thereafter.17        (3) Provide remittance advice with the corresponding 18    payment that outlines individually per claim: the name of 19    the patient; the date of service; the service code or, if 20    no service code is available, a service description; the 21    amount being paid; the claim number; and other identifying 22    claim information found on an explanation of benefits 23    form. 24    (215 ILCS 111/45 new)  SB1984- 8 -LRB104 06096 BAB 16129 b1    Sec. 45. Payment. Nothing in this Act requires a dental 2care provider to only accept electronic payment from a dental 3plan carrier. Dental plan carriers shall allow alternative 4forms of payment, without additional fees or charges, to a 5dental care provider, if requested. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.